Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1120
Automatic recount; certificate of nomination; certificate of election; issuance by election commissioner or county clerk; when.

After the recount under section 32-1119 has been certified, the election commissioner or county clerk shall make a certificate of election or a certificate of nomination in the case of a primary election for the person having the highest number of votes for the office covered by the recount and cause the certificate to be delivered to the person entitled to the certificate.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 363.